Illinois, session 104th, HB1594.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Illinois Human Rights Act is amended by 5changing Sections 2-102 and by adding Section 5-102.3 as 6follows: 7    (775 ILCS 5/2-102)8    (Text of Section before amendment by P.A. 103-804)9    Sec. 2-102. Civil rights violations; employment violations -10 employment. It is a civil rights violation:11        (A) Employers. For any employer to refuse to hire, to 12    segregate, to engage in harassment as defined in 13    subsection (E-1) of Section 2-101, or to act with respect 14    to recruitment, hiring, promotion, renewal of employment, 15    selection for training or apprenticeship, discharge, 16    discipline, tenure or terms, privileges or conditions of 17    employment on the basis of unlawful discrimination, 18    citizenship status, work authorization status, or family 19    responsibilities. An employer is responsible for 20    harassment by the employer's nonmanagerial and 21    nonsupervisory employees only if the employer becomes 22    aware of the conduct and fails to take reasonable 23    corrective measures.   HB1594- 2 -LRB104 06954 JRC 16991 b1        (A-5) Language. For an employer to impose a 2    restriction that has the effect of prohibiting a language 3    from being spoken by an employee in communications that 4    are unrelated to the employee's duties.5        For the purposes of this subdivision (A-5), "language" 6    means a person's native tongue, such as Polish, Spanish, 7    or Chinese. "Language" does not include such things as 8    slang, jargon, profanity, or vulgarity.9        (A-10) Harassment of nonemployees. For any employer, 10    employment agency, or labor organization to engage in 11    harassment of nonemployees in the workplace. An employer 12    is responsible for harassment of nonemployees by the 13    employer's nonmanagerial and nonsupervisory employees only 14    if the employer becomes aware of the conduct and fails to 15    take reasonable corrective measures. For the purposes of 16    this subdivision (A-10), "nonemployee" means a person who 17    is not otherwise an employee of the employer and is 18    directly performing services for the employer pursuant to 19    a contract with that employer. "Nonemployee" includes 20    contractors and consultants. This subdivision applies to 21    harassment occurring on or after January 1, 2020 (the 22    effective date of Public Act 101-221) this amendatory Act 23    of the 101st General Assembly. 24        (B) Employment agency. For any employment agency to 25    fail or refuse to classify properly, accept applications 26    and register for employment referral or apprenticeship   HB1594- 3 -LRB104 06954 JRC 16991 b1    referral, refer for employment, or refer for 2    apprenticeship on the basis of unlawful discrimination, 3    citizenship status, work authorization status, or family 4    responsibilities or to accept from any person any job 5    order, requisition or request for referral of applicants 6    for employment or apprenticeship which makes or has the 7    effect of making unlawful discrimination or discrimination 8    on the basis of citizenship status, work authorization 9    status, or family responsibilities a condition of 10    referral.11        (C) Labor organization. For any labor organization to 12    limit, segregate or classify its membership, or to limit 13    employment opportunities, selection and training for 14    apprenticeship in any trade or craft, or otherwise to 15    take, or fail to take, any action which affects adversely 16    any person's status as an employee or as an applicant for 17    employment or as an apprentice, or as an applicant for 18    apprenticeships, or wages, tenure, hours of employment or 19    apprenticeship conditions on the basis of unlawful 20    discrimination, citizenship status, work authorization 21    status, or family responsibilities.22        (D) Sexual harassment. For any employer, employee, 23    agent of any employer, employment agency or labor 24    organization to engage in sexual harassment; provided, 25    that an employer shall be responsible for sexual 26    harassment of the employer's employees by nonemployees or   HB1594- 4 -LRB104 06954 JRC 16991 b1    nonmanagerial and nonsupervisory employees only if the 2    employer becomes aware of the conduct and fails to take 3    reasonable corrective measures.4        (D-5) Sexual harassment of nonemployees. For any 5    employer, employee, agent of any employer, employment 6    agency, or labor organization to engage in sexual 7    harassment of nonemployees in the workplace. An employer 8    is responsible for sexual harassment of nonemployees by 9    the employer's nonmanagerial and nonsupervisory employees 10    only if the employer becomes aware of the conduct and 11    fails to take reasonable corrective measures. For the 12    purposes of this subdivision (D-5), "nonemployee" means a 13    person who is not otherwise an employee of the employer 14    and is directly performing services for the employer 15    pursuant to a contract with that employer. "Nonemployee" 16    includes contractors and consultants. This subdivision 17    applies to sexual harassment occurring on or after January 18    1, 2020 (the effective date of Public Act 101-221) this 19    amendatory Act of the 101st General Assembly. 20        (E) Public employers. For any public employer to 21    refuse to permit a public employee under its jurisdiction 22    who takes time off from work in order to practice his or 23    her religious beliefs to engage in work, during hours 24    other than such employee's regular working hours, 25    consistent with the operational needs of the employer and 26    in order to compensate for work time lost for such   HB1594- 5 -LRB104 06954 JRC 16991 b1    religious reasons. Any employee who elects such deferred 2    work shall be compensated at the wage rate which he or she 3    would have earned during the originally scheduled work 4    period. The employer may require that an employee who 5    plans to take time off from work in order to practice his 6    or her religious beliefs provide the employer with a 7    notice of his or her intention to be absent from work not 8    exceeding 5 days prior to the date of absence.9        (E-5) Religious discrimination. For any employer to 10    impose upon a person as a condition of obtaining or 11    retaining employment, including opportunities for 12    promotion, advancement, or transfer, any terms or 13    conditions that would require such person to violate or 14    forgo a sincerely held practice of his or her religion 15    including, but not limited to, the wearing of any attire, 16    clothing, or facial hair in accordance with the 17    requirements of his or her religion, unless, after 18    engaging in a bona fide effort, the employer demonstrates 19    that it is unable to reasonably accommodate the employee's 20    or prospective employee's sincerely held religious belief, 21    practice, or observance without undue hardship on the 22    conduct of the employer's business. 23        Nothing in this Section prohibits an employer from 24    enacting a dress code or grooming policy that may include 25    restrictions on attire, clothing, or facial hair to 26    maintain workplace safety or food sanitation.   HB1594- 6 -LRB104 06954 JRC 16991 b1        (F) Training and apprenticeship programs. For any 2    employer, employment agency or labor organization to 3    discriminate against a person on the basis of age in the 4    selection, referral for or conduct of apprenticeship or 5    training programs.6        (G) Immigration-related practices. 7            (1) for an employer to request for purposes of 8        satisfying the requirements of Section 1324a(b) of 9        Title 8 of the United States Code, as now or hereafter 10        amended, more or different documents than are required 11        under such Section or to refuse to honor documents 12        tendered that on their face reasonably appear to be 13        genuine or to refuse to honor work authorization based 14        upon the specific status or term of status that 15        accompanies the authorization to work; or16            (2) for an employer participating in the E-Verify 17        Program, as authorized by 8 U.S.C. 1324a, Notes, Pilot 18        Programs for Employment Eligibility Confirmation 19        (enacted by PL 104-208, div. C title IV, subtitle A) to 20        refuse to hire, to segregate, or to act with respect to 21        recruitment, hiring, promotion, renewal of employment, 22        selection for training or apprenticeship, discharge, 23        discipline, tenure or terms, privileges or conditions 24        of employment without following the procedures under 25        the E-Verify Program.26        (H) (Blank).   HB1594- 7 -LRB104 06954 JRC 16991 b1        (H-5) Weight and size.2            (1) For an employer or licensing agency, on the 3        basis of an individual's weight and size, to refuse to 4        hire or employ the individual, to bar or discharge the 5        individual from employment, or to discriminate against 6        the individual in compensation or in terms, 7        conditions, or privileges of employment.8            (2) For an employment agency, on the basis of an 9        individual's weight and size, to discriminate in 10        receiving, classifying, disposing, or otherwise acting 11        upon an application for the employment agency's 12        services or in referring an individual to an employer.13            (3) For a labor organization, on the basis of an 14        individual's weight and size, to exclude an 15        individual, to expel an individual from its 16        membership, or to discriminate in any way against any 17        of its members or against any employer or any 18        individual employed by an employer.19            (4) For any employer or employment agency to print 20        or circulate, or cause to be printed or circulated, 21        any statement, advertisement, or publication, or to 22        use any form of application for employment or to make 23        any inquiry in connection with prospective employment 24        which expresses, directly or indirectly, any 25        limitation, specification, or discrimination as to 26        weight and size, or any intent to make a weight and   HB1594- 8 -LRB104 06954 JRC 16991 b1        size limitation, specification, or discrimination, 2        unless based upon a bona fide occupational 3        qualification. 4        (I) Pregnancy. For an employer to refuse to hire, to 5    segregate, or to act with respect to recruitment, hiring, 6    promotion, renewal of employment, selection for training 7    or apprenticeship, discharge, discipline, tenure or terms, 8    privileges or conditions of employment on the basis of 9    pregnancy, childbirth, or medical or common conditions 10    related to pregnancy or childbirth. Women affected by 11    pregnancy, childbirth, or medical or common conditions 12    related to pregnancy or childbirth shall be treated the 13    same for all employment-related purposes, including 14    receipt of benefits under fringe benefit programs, as 15    other persons not so affected but similar in their ability 16    or inability to work, regardless of the source of the 17    inability to work or employment classification or status. 18        (J) Pregnancy; reasonable accommodations.19            (1) If after a job applicant or employee, 20        including a part-time, full-time, or probationary 21        employee, requests a reasonable accommodation, for an 22        employer to not make reasonable accommodations for any 23        medical or common condition of a job applicant or 24        employee related to pregnancy or childbirth, unless 25        the employer can demonstrate that the accommodation 26        would impose an undue hardship on the ordinary   HB1594- 9 -LRB104 06954 JRC 16991 b1        operation of the business of the employer. The 2        employer may request documentation from the employee's 3        health care provider concerning the need for the 4        requested reasonable accommodation or accommodations 5        to the same extent documentation is requested for 6        conditions related to disability if the employer's 7        request for documentation is job-related and 8        consistent with business necessity. The employer may 9        require only the medical justification for the 10        requested accommodation or accommodations, a 11        description of the reasonable accommodation or 12        accommodations medically advisable, the date the 13        reasonable accommodation or accommodations became 14        medically advisable, and the probable duration of the 15        reasonable accommodation or accommodations. It is the 16        duty of the individual seeking a reasonable 17        accommodation or accommodations to submit to the 18        employer any documentation that is requested in 19        accordance with this paragraph. Notwithstanding the 20        provisions of this paragraph, the employer may require 21        documentation by the employee's health care provider 22        to determine compliance with other laws. The employee 23        and employer shall engage in a timely, good faith, and 24        meaningful exchange to determine effective reasonable 25        accommodations.26            (2) For an employer to deny employment   HB1594- 10 -LRB104 06954 JRC 16991 b1        opportunities or benefits to or take adverse action 2        against an otherwise qualified job applicant or 3        employee, including a part-time, full-time, or 4        probationary employee, if the denial or adverse action 5        is based on the need of the employer to make reasonable 6        accommodations to the known medical or common 7        conditions related to the pregnancy or childbirth of 8        the applicant or employee.9            (3) For an employer to require a job applicant or 10        employee, including a part-time, full-time, or 11        probationary employee, affected by pregnancy, 12        childbirth, or medical or common conditions related to 13        pregnancy or childbirth to accept an accommodation 14        when the applicant or employee did not request an 15        accommodation and the applicant or employee chooses 16        not to accept the employer's accommodation.17            (4) For an employer to require an employee, 18        including a part-time, full-time, or probationary 19        employee, to take leave under any leave law or policy 20        of the employer if another reasonable accommodation 21        can be provided to the known medical or common 22        conditions related to the pregnancy or childbirth of 23        an employee. No employer shall fail or refuse to 24        reinstate the employee affected by pregnancy, 25        childbirth, or medical or common conditions related to 26        pregnancy or childbirth to her original job or to an   HB1594- 11 -LRB104 06954 JRC 16991 b1        equivalent position with equivalent pay and 2        accumulated seniority, retirement, fringe benefits, 3        and other applicable service credits upon her 4        signifying her intent to return or when her need for 5        reasonable accommodation ceases, unless the employer 6        can demonstrate that the accommodation would impose an 7        undue hardship on the ordinary operation of the 8        business of the employer.9        For the purposes of this subdivision (J), "reasonable 10    accommodations" means reasonable modifications or 11    adjustments to the job application process or work 12    environment, or to the manner or circumstances under which 13    the position desired or held is customarily performed, 14    that enable an applicant or employee affected by 15    pregnancy, childbirth, or medical or common conditions 16    related to pregnancy or childbirth to be considered for 17    the position the applicant desires or to perform the 18    essential functions of that position, and may include, but 19    is not limited to: more frequent or longer bathroom 20    breaks, breaks for increased water intake, and breaks for 21    periodic rest; private non-bathroom space for expressing 22    breast milk and breastfeeding; seating; assistance with 23    manual labor; light duty; temporary transfer to a less 24    strenuous or hazardous position; the provision of an 25    accessible worksite; acquisition or modification of 26    equipment; job restructuring; a part-time or modified work   HB1594- 12 -LRB104 06954 JRC 16991 b1    schedule; appropriate adjustment or modifications of 2    examinations, training materials, or policies; 3    reassignment to a vacant position; time off to recover 4    from conditions related to childbirth; and leave 5    necessitated by pregnancy, childbirth, or medical or 6    common conditions resulting from pregnancy or childbirth.7        For the purposes of this subdivision (J), "undue 8    hardship" means an action that is prohibitively expensive 9    or disruptive when considered in light of the following 10    factors: (i) the nature and cost of the accommodation 11    needed; (ii) the overall financial resources of the 12    facility or facilities involved in the provision of the 13    reasonable accommodation, the number of persons employed 14    at the facility, the effect on expenses and resources, or 15    the impact otherwise of the accommodation upon the 16    operation of the facility; (iii) the overall financial 17    resources of the employer, the overall size of the 18    business of the employer with respect to the number of its 19    employees, and the number, type, and location of its 20    facilities; and (iv) the type of operation or operations 21    of the employer, including the composition, structure, and 22    functions of the workforce of the employer, the geographic 23    separateness, administrative, or fiscal relationship of 24    the facility or facilities in question to the employer. 25    The employer has the burden of proving undue hardship. The 26    fact that the employer provides or would be required to   HB1594- 13 -LRB104 06954 JRC 16991 b1    provide a similar accommodation to similarly situated 2    employees creates a rebuttable presumption that the 3    accommodation does not impose an undue hardship on the 4    employer.5        No employer is required by this subdivision (J) to 6    create additional employment that the employer would not 7    otherwise have created, unless the employer does so or 8    would do so for other classes of employees who need 9    accommodation. The employer is not required to discharge 10    any employee, transfer any employee with more seniority, 11    or promote any employee who is not qualified to perform 12    the job, unless the employer does so or would do so to 13    accommodate other classes of employees who need it.14        (K) Notice.15            (1) For an employer to fail to post or keep posted 16        in a conspicuous location on the premises of the 17        employer where notices to employees are customarily 18        posted, or fail to include in any employee handbook 19        information concerning an employee's rights under this 20        Article, a notice, to be prepared or approved by the 21        Department, summarizing the requirements of this 22        Article and information pertaining to the filing of a 23        charge, including the right to be free from unlawful 24        discrimination, the right to be free from sexual 25        harassment, and the right to certain reasonable 26        accommodations. The Department shall make the   HB1594- 14 -LRB104 06954 JRC 16991 b1        documents required under this paragraph available for 2        retrieval from the Department's website. 3            (2) Upon notification of a violation of paragraph 4        (1) of this subdivision (K), the Department may launch 5        a preliminary investigation. If the Department finds a 6        violation, the Department may issue a notice to show 7        cause giving the employer 30 days to correct the 8        violation. If the violation is not corrected, the 9        Department may initiate a charge of a civil rights 10        violation. 11(Source: P.A. 102-233, eff. 8-2-21; 103-797, eff. 1-1-25; 12revised 10-7-24.) 13    (Text of Section after amendment by P.A. 103-804)14    Sec. 2-102. Civil rights violations; employment violations -15 employment. It is a civil rights violation:16        (A) Employers. For any employer to refuse to hire, to 17    segregate, to engage in harassment as defined in 18    subsection (E-1) of Section 2-101, or to act with respect 19    to recruitment, hiring, promotion, renewal of employment, 20    selection for training or apprenticeship, discharge, 21    discipline, tenure or terms, privileges or conditions of 22    employment on the basis of unlawful discrimination, 23    citizenship status, work authorization status, or family 24    responsibilities. An employer is responsible for 25    harassment by the employer's nonmanagerial and   HB1594- 15 -LRB104 06954 JRC 16991 b1    nonsupervisory employees only if the employer becomes 2    aware of the conduct and fails to take reasonable 3    corrective measures. 4        (A-5) Language. For an employer to impose a 5    restriction that has the effect of prohibiting a language 6    from being spoken by an employee in communications that 7    are unrelated to the employee's duties.8        For the purposes of this subdivision (A-5), "language" 9    means a person's native tongue, such as Polish, Spanish, 10    or Chinese. "Language" does not include such things as 11    slang, jargon, profanity, or vulgarity.12        (A-10) Harassment of nonemployees. For any employer, 13    employment agency, or labor organization to engage in 14    harassment of nonemployees in the workplace. An employer 15    is responsible for harassment of nonemployees by the 16    employer's nonmanagerial and nonsupervisory employees only 17    if the employer becomes aware of the conduct and fails to 18    take reasonable corrective measures. For the purposes of 19    this subdivision (A-10), "nonemployee" means a person who 20    is not otherwise an employee of the employer and is 21    directly performing services for the employer pursuant to 22    a contract with that employer. "Nonemployee" includes 23    contractors and consultants. This subdivision applies to 24    harassment occurring on or after January 1, 2020 (the 25    effective date of Public Act 101-221) this amendatory Act 26    of the 101st General Assembly.   HB1594- 16 -LRB104 06954 JRC 16991 b1        (B) Employment agency. For any employment agency to 2    fail or refuse to classify properly, accept applications 3    and register for employment referral or apprenticeship 4    referral, refer for employment, or refer for 5    apprenticeship on the basis of unlawful discrimination, 6    citizenship status, work authorization status, or family 7    responsibilities or to accept from any person any job 8    order, requisition or request for referral of applicants 9    for employment or apprenticeship which makes or has the 10    effect of making unlawful discrimination or discrimination 11    on the basis of citizenship status, work authorization 12    status, or family responsibilities a condition of 13    referral.14        (C) Labor organization. For any labor organization to 15    limit, segregate or classify its membership, or to limit 16    employment opportunities, selection and training for 17    apprenticeship in any trade or craft, or otherwise to 18    take, or fail to take, any action which affects adversely 19    any person's status as an employee or as an applicant for 20    employment or as an apprentice, or as an applicant for 21    apprenticeships, or wages, tenure, hours of employment or 22    apprenticeship conditions on the basis of unlawful 23    discrimination, citizenship status, work authorization 24    status, or family responsibilities.25        (D) Sexual harassment. For any employer, employee, 26    agent of any employer, employment agency or labor   HB1594- 17 -LRB104 06954 JRC 16991 b1    organization to engage in sexual harassment; provided, 2    that an employer shall be responsible for sexual 3    harassment of the employer's employees by nonemployees or 4    nonmanagerial and nonsupervisory employees only if the 5    employer becomes aware of the conduct and fails to take 6    reasonable corrective measures.7        (D-5) Sexual harassment of nonemployees. For any 8    employer, employee, agent of any employer, employment 9    agency, or labor organization to engage in sexual 10    harassment of nonemployees in the workplace. An employer 11    is responsible for sexual harassment of nonemployees by 12    the employer's nonmanagerial and nonsupervisory employees 13    only if the employer becomes aware of the conduct and 14    fails to take reasonable corrective measures. For the 15    purposes of this subdivision (D-5), "nonemployee" means a 16    person who is not otherwise an employee of the employer 17    and is directly performing services for the employer 18    pursuant to a contract with that employer. "Nonemployee" 19    includes contractors and consultants. This subdivision 20    applies to sexual harassment occurring on or after January 21    1, 2020 (the effective date of Public Act 101-221) this 22    amendatory Act of the 101st General Assembly. 23        (E) Public employers. For any public employer to 24    refuse to permit a public employee under its jurisdiction 25    who takes time off from work in order to practice his or 26    her religious beliefs to engage in work, during hours   HB1594- 18 -LRB104 06954 JRC 16991 b1    other than such employee's regular working hours, 2    consistent with the operational needs of the employer and 3    in order to compensate for work time lost for such 4    religious reasons. Any employee who elects such deferred 5    work shall be compensated at the wage rate which he or she 6    would have earned during the originally scheduled work 7    period. The employer may require that an employee who 8    plans to take time off from work in order to practice his 9    or her religious beliefs provide the employer with a 10    notice of his or her intention to be absent from work not 11    exceeding 5 days prior to the date of absence.12        (E-5) Religious discrimination. For any employer to 13    impose upon a person as a condition of obtaining or 14    retaining employment, including opportunities for 15    promotion, advancement, or transfer, any terms or 16    conditions that would require such person to violate or 17    forgo a sincerely held practice of his or her religion 18    including, but not limited to, the wearing of any attire, 19    clothing, or facial hair in accordance with the 20    requirements of his or her religion, unless, after 21    engaging in a bona fide effort, the employer demonstrates 22    that it is unable to reasonably accommodate the employee's 23    or prospective employee's sincerely held religious belief, 24    practice, or observance without undue hardship on the 25    conduct of the employer's business. 26        Nothing in this Section prohibits an employer from   HB1594- 19 -LRB104 06954 JRC 16991 b1    enacting a dress code or grooming policy that may include 2    restrictions on attire, clothing, or facial hair to 3    maintain workplace safety or food sanitation. 4        (F) Training and apprenticeship programs. For any 5    employer, employment agency or labor organization to 6    discriminate against a person on the basis of age in the 7    selection, referral for or conduct of apprenticeship or 8    training programs.9        (G) Immigration-related practices. 10            (1) for an employer to request for purposes of 11        satisfying the requirements of Section 1324a(b) of 12        Title 8 of the United States Code, as now or hereafter 13        amended, more or different documents than are required 14        under such Section or to refuse to honor documents 15        tendered that on their face reasonably appear to be 16        genuine or to refuse to honor work authorization based 17        upon the specific status or term of status that 18        accompanies the authorization to work; or19            (2) for an employer participating in the E-Verify 20        Program, as authorized by 8 U.S.C. 1324a, Notes, Pilot 21        Programs for Employment Eligibility Confirmation 22        (enacted by PL 104-208, div. C title IV, subtitle A) to 23        refuse to hire, to segregate, or to act with respect to 24        recruitment, hiring, promotion, renewal of employment, 25        selection for training or apprenticeship, discharge, 26        discipline, tenure or terms, privileges or conditions   HB1594- 20 -LRB104 06954 JRC 16991 b1        of employment without following the procedures under 2        the E-Verify Program.3        (H) (Blank). 4        (H-5) Weight and size.5            (1) For an employer or licensing agency, on the 6        basis of an individual's weight and size, to refuse to 7        hire or employ the individual, to bar or discharge the 8        individual from employment, or to discriminate against 9        the individual in compensation or in terms, 10        conditions, or privileges of employment.11            (2) For an employment agency, on the basis of an 12        individual's weight and size, to discriminate in 13        receiving, classifying, disposing, or otherwise acting 14        upon an application for the employment agency's 15        services or in referring an individual to an employer.16            (3) For a labor organization, on the basis of an 17        individual's weight and size, to exclude an 18        individual, to expel an individual from its 19        membership, or to discriminate in any way against any 20        of its members or against any employer or any 21        individual employed by an employer.22            (4) For any employer or employment agency to print 23        or circulate, or cause to be printed or circulated, 24        any statement, advertisement, or publication, or to 25        use any form of application for employment or to make 26        any inquiry in connection with prospective employment   HB1594- 21 -LRB104 06954 JRC 16991 b1        which expresses, directly or indirectly, any 2        limitation, specification, or discrimination as to 3        weight and size, or any intent to make a weight and 4        size limitation, specification, or discrimination, 5        unless based upon a bona fide occupational 6        qualification. 7        (I) Pregnancy. For an employer to refuse to hire, to 8    segregate, or to act with respect to recruitment, hiring, 9    promotion, renewal of employment, selection for training 10    or apprenticeship, discharge, discipline, tenure or terms, 11    privileges or conditions of employment on the basis of 12    pregnancy, childbirth, or medical or common conditions 13    related to pregnancy or childbirth. Women affected by 14    pregnancy, childbirth, or medical or common conditions 15    related to pregnancy or childbirth shall be treated the 16    same for all employment-related purposes, including 17    receipt of benefits under fringe benefit programs, as 18    other persons not so affected but similar in their ability 19    or inability to work, regardless of the source of the 20    inability to work or employment classification or status. 21        (J) Pregnancy; reasonable accommodations.22            (1) If after a job applicant or employee, 23        including a part-time, full-time, or probationary 24        employee, requests a reasonable accommodation, for an 25        employer to not make reasonable accommodations for any 26        medical or common condition of a job applicant or   HB1594- 22 -LRB104 06954 JRC 16991 b1        employee related to pregnancy or childbirth, unless 2        the employer can demonstrate that the accommodation 3        would impose an undue hardship on the ordinary 4        operation of the business of the employer. The 5        employer may request documentation from the employee's 6        health care provider concerning the need for the 7        requested reasonable accommodation or accommodations 8        to the same extent documentation is requested for 9        conditions related to disability if the employer's 10        request for documentation is job-related and 11        consistent with business necessity. The employer may 12        require only the medical justification for the 13        requested accommodation or accommodations, a 14        description of the reasonable accommodation or 15        accommodations medically advisable, the date the 16        reasonable accommodation or accommodations became 17        medically advisable, and the probable duration of the 18        reasonable accommodation or accommodations. It is the 19        duty of the individual seeking a reasonable 20        accommodation or accommodations to submit to the 21        employer any documentation that is requested in 22        accordance with this paragraph. Notwithstanding the 23        provisions of this paragraph, the employer may require 24        documentation by the employee's health care provider 25        to determine compliance with other laws. The employee 26        and employer shall engage in a timely, good faith, and   HB1594- 23 -LRB104 06954 JRC 16991 b1        meaningful exchange to determine effective reasonable 2        accommodations.3            (2) For an employer to deny employment 4        opportunities or benefits to or take adverse action 5        against an otherwise qualified job applicant or 6        employee, including a part-time, full-time, or 7        probationary employee, if the denial or adverse action 8        is based on the need of the employer to make reasonable 9        accommodations to the known medical or common 10        conditions related to the pregnancy or childbirth of 11        the applicant or employee.12            (3) For an employer to require a job applicant or 13        employee, including a part-time, full-time, or 14        probationary employee, affected by pregnancy, 15        childbirth, or medical or common conditions related to 16        pregnancy or childbirth to accept an accommodation 17        when the applicant or employee did not request an 18        accommodation and the applicant or employee chooses 19        not to accept the employer's accommodation.20            (4) For an employer to require an employee, 21        including a part-time, full-time, or probationary 22        employee, to take leave under any leave law or policy 23        of the employer if another reasonable accommodation 24        can be provided to the known medical or common 25        conditions related to the pregnancy or childbirth of 26        an employee. No employer shall fail or refuse to   HB1594- 24 -LRB104 06954 JRC 16991 b1        reinstate the employee affected by pregnancy, 2        childbirth, or medical or common conditions related to 3        pregnancy or childbirth to her original job or to an 4        equivalent position with equivalent pay and 5        accumulated seniority, retirement, fringe benefits, 6        and other applicable service credits upon her 7        signifying her intent to return or when her need for 8        reasonable accommodation ceases, unless the employer 9        can demonstrate that the accommodation would impose an 10        undue hardship on the ordinary operation of the 11        business of the employer.12        For the purposes of this subdivision (J), "reasonable 13    accommodations" means reasonable modifications or 14    adjustments to the job application process or work 15    environment, or to the manner or circumstances under which 16    the position desired or held is customarily performed, 17    that enable an applicant or employee affected by 18    pregnancy, childbirth, or medical or common conditions 19    related to pregnancy or childbirth to be considered for 20    the position the applicant desires or to perform the 21    essential functions of that position, and may include, but 22    is not limited to: more frequent or longer bathroom 23    breaks, breaks for increased water intake, and breaks for 24    periodic rest; private non-bathroom space for expressing 25    breast milk and breastfeeding; seating; assistance with 26    manual labor; light duty; temporary transfer to a less   HB1594- 25 -LRB104 06954 JRC 16991 b1    strenuous or hazardous position; the provision of an 2    accessible worksite; acquisition or modification of 3    equipment; job restructuring; a part-time or modified work 4    schedule; appropriate adjustment or modifications of 5    examinations, training materials, or policies; 6    reassignment to a vacant position; time off to recover 7    from conditions related to childbirth; and leave 8    necessitated by pregnancy, childbirth, or medical or 9    common conditions resulting from pregnancy or childbirth.10        For the purposes of this subdivision (J), "undue 11    hardship" means an action that is prohibitively expensive 12    or disruptive when considered in light of the following 13    factors: (i) the nature and cost of the accommodation 14    needed; (ii) the overall financial resources of the 15    facility or facilities involved in the provision of the 16    reasonable accommodation, the number of persons employed 17    at the facility, the effect on expenses and resources, or 18    the impact otherwise of the accommodation upon the 19    operation of the facility; (iii) the overall financial 20    resources of the employer, the overall size of the 21    business of the employer with respect to the number of its 22    employees, and the number, type, and location of its 23    facilities; and (iv) the type of operation or operations 24    of the employer, including the composition, structure, and 25    functions of the workforce of the employer, the geographic 26    separateness, administrative, or fiscal relationship of   HB1594- 26 -LRB104 06954 JRC 16991 b1    the facility or facilities in question to the employer. 2    The employer has the burden of proving undue hardship. The 3    fact that the employer provides or would be required to 4    provide a similar accommodation to similarly situated 5    employees creates a rebuttable presumption that the 6    accommodation does not impose an undue hardship on the 7    employer.8        No employer is required by this subdivision (J) to 9    create additional employment that the employer would not 10    otherwise have created, unless the employer does so or 11    would do so for other classes of employees who need 12    accommodation. The employer is not required to discharge 13    any employee, transfer any employee with more seniority, 14    or promote any employee who is not qualified to perform 15    the job, unless the employer does so or would do so to 16    accommodate other classes of employees who need it.17        (K) Notice.18            (1) For an employer to fail to post or keep posted 19        in a conspicuous location on the premises of the 20        employer where notices to employees are customarily 21        posted, or fail to include in any employee handbook 22        information concerning an employee's rights under this 23        Article, a notice, to be prepared or approved by the 24        Department, summarizing the requirements of this 25        Article and information pertaining to the filing of a 26        charge, including the right to be free from unlawful   HB1594- 27 -LRB104 06954 JRC 16991 b1        discrimination, the right to be free from sexual 2        harassment, and the right to certain reasonable 3        accommodations. The Department shall make the 4        documents required under this paragraph available for 5        retrieval from the Department's website. 6            (2) Upon notification of a violation of paragraph 7        (1) of this subdivision (K), the Department may launch 8        a preliminary investigation. If the Department finds a 9        violation, the Department may issue a notice to show 10        cause giving the employer 30 days to correct the 11        violation. If the violation is not corrected, the 12        Department may initiate a charge of a civil rights 13        violation. 14        (L) Use of artificial intelligence.15            (1) With respect to recruitment, hiring, 16        promotion, renewal of employment, selection for 17        training or apprenticeship, discharge, discipline, 18        tenure, or the terms, privileges, or conditions of 19        employment, for an employer to use artificial 20        intelligence that has the effect of subjecting 21        employees to discrimination on the basis of protected 22        classes under this Article or to use zip codes as a 23        proxy for protected classes under this Article.24            (2) For an employer to fail to provide notice to an 25        employee that the employer is using artificial 26        intelligence for the purposes described in paragraph   HB1594- 28 -LRB104 06954 JRC 16991 b1        (1).2        The Department shall adopt any rules necessary for the 3    implementation and enforcement of this subdivision, 4    including, but not limited to, rules on the circumstances 5    and conditions that require notice, the time period for 6    providing notice, and the means for providing notice.7(Source: P.A. 102-233, eff. 8-2-21; 103-797, eff. 1-1-25; 8103-804, eff. 1-1-26; revised 11-26-24.) 9    (775 ILCS 5/5-102.3 new)10    Sec. 5-102.3. Public accommodations; weight and size. It 11is a civil rights violation for any person, being the owner, 12lessee, proprietor, manager, superintendent, agent, or 13employee of any place of public accommodation, because of the 14weight and size of any person, directly or indirectly, to 15refuse, withhold from, or deny to any individual any of the 16accommodations, advantages, facilities, or privileges thereof. 17    Section 95. No acceleration or delay. Where this Act makes 18changes in a statute that is represented in this Act by text 19that is not yet or no longer in effect (for example, a Section 20represented by multiple versions), the use of that text does 21not accelerate or delay the taking effect of (i) the changes 22made by this Act or (ii) provisions derived from any other 23Public Act.